src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-83nwstma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `nõstma: # Verb (83) `nõstma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     nõstma+V+Inf/mA: nõstma
     nõstma+V+Inf: nõstaq
     nõstma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: nõstnuq
     nõstma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: nõstõt

     nõstma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nõsta
     nõstma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: nõstat
     nõstma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nõst
     nõstma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: nõstamiq
     nõstma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: nõstatiq
     nõstma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nõstvaq
     nõstma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nõsti
     nõstma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: nõstit
     nõstma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: nõst́
     nõstma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: nõstimiq
     nõstma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: nõstitiq
     nõstma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nõstiq
     nõstma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: nõsta

     nõstma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nõstõda
     nõstma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nõstõtas

     nõstma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: nõstva

     nõstma+V+Jus: nõstkuq
